Georgia, session 2025_26, SB306.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 48-5-7.4 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to preferential
assessment for bona fide conservation use property and bona fide residential transitional
property, is amended by revising subsection (d) and adding a new subsection to read as
follows:
"(d) No property shall qualify for current use assessment under this Code section unless
and until the owner of such property agrees by covenant with the appropriate taxing
authority to maintain the eligible property in bona fide qualifying use for a period of ten
years beginning on the first day of January of the year in which such property qualifies for
S. B. 306
- 1 -

LC 50 1187
such current use assessment and ending on the last day of December of the final year of the
covenant period. After the owner has applied for and has been allowed current use
assessment provided for in this Code section, it shall not be necessary to make application
thereafter for any year in which the covenant period is in effect and current use assessment
shall continue to be allowed such owner as specified in this Code section. At least 60 days
prior to the expiration date of the covenant, the county board of tax assessors shall send by
first-class certified mail written notification of such impending expiration. Except as
provided in subsection (d.1) of this Code section, upon Upon the expiration of any
covenant period, the property shall not qualify for further current use assessment under this
Code section unless and until the owner of the property has entered into a renewal covenant
for an additional period of ten years; provided, however, that the owner may enter into a
renewal contract in the ninth year of a covenant period so that the contract is continued
without a lapse for an additional ten years. If the owner of the covenant does not receive
certified notice of the impending expiration as required by this subsection, the covenant
shall automatically extend for one year.
(d.1)(1) This subsection shall apply in the case of any property:
(A) For which the covenant required under subsection (d) of this Code section expired
during the two years immediately preceding July 1, 2025;
(B) That, during the period after the expiration of the covenant required under
subsection (d) of this Code section, continued to qualify for current use assessment
under this Code section and did not receive another preferential assessment; and
(C) The owner of which claims he or she did not receive written notification of the
impending expiration of such covenant as required pursuant to subsection (d) of this
Code section and the county board of tax assessors cannot produce a record of such
notification.
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter to the contrary, for a property
that meets the requirements of paragraph (1) of this subsection the covenant required
S. B. 306
- 2 -

LC 50 1187
under subsection (d) of this Code section shall be deemed to be reinstated and the owner
of the property shall only be liable for the taxes that would have been imposed if such
covenant had not expired.
(3) Notwithstanding the procedures and requirements for appeals provided in this chapter
to the contrary, the owner of any property that meets the requirements of paragraph (1)
of this subsection may appeal the assessment of such property for the time period stated
in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of this subsection. The county board of tax
commissioners shall refund to the owner any amount of taxes paid in excess of such
amount, and no other costs, fees, or interest shall be imposed on such owner in relation
to such appeal."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
S. B. 306
- 3 -